Utah statutes.
73-3-15.   Dismissal of action for review of informal adjudicative
proceedings.
(1)  An action to review a decision of the state engineer from an informal
adjudicative proceeding may be dismissed upon the application of any of the
parties upon the grounds provided in Utah Rules of Civil Procedure, Rule 41
for:
(a)  the dismissal of actions generally; and
(b)  failure to prosecute the action with diligence.
(2)  For the purpose of this section, failure to prosecute a suit to trial
within two years after it is filed gives rise to a rebuttable presumption of a
lack of diligence.
(3)  In evaluating the rebuttable presumption, the court shall consider the
totality of the circumstances.
